Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 5

Wildlife Management Endowment Fund

70-1-501. Wildlife management endowment fund established.

The general assembly recognizes and reaffirms the importance to the citizens of Tennessee of management, protection, propagation, and conservation of wildlife, including the importance of protecting and preserving for future generations the heritage of hunting and fishing in the state. Further, the general assembly recognizes the importance of providing the opportunity for citizens to invest in the future of its wildlife resources. Therefore, in order to aid in future funding for the wildlife resources agency to continue establishing and carrying out fish and wildlife programs and to assure protection and preservation for future generations of the heritage of hunting and fishing in the state, there is hereby created a fund known as the “wildlife management endowment fund.”

Acts 1998, ch. 610, § 2.

70-1-502. Assets.

The wildlife management endowment fund shall consist of the following assets deposited to the fund:

The proceeds from the sale of lifetime sportsman licenses;

The proceeds from cash donations or donations of property converted or to be converted to cash;

Such other sources as may be deemed appropriate, including sources that may be specified by law; and

Income derived from fund investments.

Acts 1998, ch. 610, § 2.

70-1-503. Investment of funds.

Moneys shall be invested pursuant to law, including, but not limited to, § 9-4-612, for the benefit of the fund. For purposes of expenditures from the fund pursuant to § 70-1-306, the wildlife management endowment fund shall be included as a part of the wildlife resources fund subject to the restrictions and requirements of the wildlife management endowment fund as set out in this part. Neither the moneys of the fund, nor the interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be used for any other purposes than those set out in this part, nor shall any part of the fund be diverted to the general fund or to any other public fund.

Acts 1998, ch. 610, § 2; 2015, ch. 196, § 2.

70-1-504. Expenditure or disbursement from principal prohibited.

No expenditure or disbursement shall be made from the principal of the wildlife management endowment fund.

Acts 1998, ch. 610, § 2.

70-1-505. Proceeds from sales of lifetime sportsman licenses to persons under sixteen years of age — Expenditure prohibited.

No expenditures or disbursements from the income from proceeds derived from the sales of lifetime sportsman licenses to holders under the age of sixteen (16) years shall be made for any purpose and shall become a part of the fund's principal. Income earned after the holder reaches the age of sixteen (16) shall be available for expenditures or disbursements. The wildlife resources agency shall cause deposits of proceeds from the sale of lifetime sportsman licenses to holders under the age of sixteen (16) to be distinguished and shall maintain information as to the ages of license holders to determine the amount of income that remains encumbered by and that is free of this restriction.

Acts 1998, ch. 610, § 2.

Cross-References. Lifetime sportsman licenses, § 70-2-201.

70-1-506. Income from invested funds to benefit wildlife.

The income received and accruing from the investments of the wildlife management endowment fund, subject to limitations prescribed for funds received from the sale of lifetime sportsman licenses to holders under the age of sixteen (16) years, may only be spent in furthering the management, protection, propagation, and conservation of wildlife to assure perpetual protection and preservation for future generations of the heritage of hunting and fishing in this state and the efficient operation of the wildlife resources agency in accomplishing these objectives.

Acts 1998, ch. 610, § 2.